Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 6

TLDA Airport Loan Act of 1988

4-31-601. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “TLDA Airport Loan Act of 1988.”

Acts 1988, ch. 820, § 1.

4-31-602. Legislative intent.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

The construction of safety improvements for airports is an essential function of airport authorities, municipal airports, and state and local governments;

The construction of projects for airport improvements, for the mitigation of noise created by activity of an airport, for the acquisition of property and rights in property, real and personal, relating thereto, and the financing of such, are essential functions of airport authorities, municipal airports, and state and local governments; and

To the extent that financing of improvements, safety improvements and noise mitigation for airport authorities and municipal airports can be accomplished through the pooling of needs and the use of less costly borrowing techniques, airport authorities, municipal airports and local governments would be better able to provide improvements, safety improvements and noise mitigation for the benefit of citizens.

It is accordingly in furtherance of the interest and welfare of all Tennesseans that the Tennessee local development authority be empowered to issue its revenue bonds and to make proceeds available for loans to airport authorities and municipal airports for improvements, safety improvements and noise mitigation projects at a cost lower than would otherwise be obtainable.

It is intended that the Tennessee local development authority be vested with all powers necessary to accomplish these purposes.

Acts 1988, ch. 820, § 1.

4-31-603. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Airport” means and includes any one (1) or more airports or heliports and related facilities of an airport authority or municipal airport, including, but not limited to, land and interests in land, facilities for storage of air and space craft, navigation and landing aids, taxiways, pads, aprons, control towers, passenger and cargo terminal buildings, hangars, administration and office buildings, garages, parking lots, and such other structures, facilities and improvements necessary or convenient to the development and maintenance of airports and heliports, and for the promotion and accommodation of air and space travel, commerce and navigation;

“Airport authority” means those airport authorities created pursuant to title 42, chapter 3 and those metropolitan airport authorities created pursuant to title 42, chapter 4;

“Construction” means the building, reconstruction, creation, replacement, extension, repair, betterment, improvement, installation, alteration, equipping, extension, development, acquisition by gift, lease, purchase, or the exercise of the right of eminent domain, or any one (1) or more of the foregoing, including the acquisition of property and rights in property, real and personal;

“Loan agreement” means a contractual arrangement by and between an airport authority or a municipal airport and the authority and, in the discretion of the authority, the creating or participating municipality providing the guaranty, pursuant to and in accordance with this part;

“Municipal airport” means those county or municipal airports created pursuant to title 42, chapter 5; and

“Project” means any one (1) or any combination of the following: safety improvements for airports; mitigation of noise created by activity of an airport, including the acquisition of property and rights in property, real and personal, related thereto; and for any purpose for which bonds or notes can be issued pursuant to the Metropolitan Airport Authority Act, compiled in title 42, chapter 4.

Acts 1988, ch. 820, § 1; 1989, ch. 233, § 4.

4-31-604. Financing of projects for use of airport authorities and municipal airports — Schedule of payments.

For the purpose of providing moneys to fund loans authorized by this part, the authority, in addition to the powers otherwise created by law, has the power and is hereby authorized to issue from time to time negotiable bonds and notes of the authority in an amount not to exceed two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) in accordance with the terms of this part.

Bonds or notes issued pursuant to this part shall not be issued and sold as part of an issue of bonds or notes of the authority issued pursuant to any other provisions of this chapter or any other law; provided, that the foregoing shall not prohibit the issuance of separate issues of bonds or notes pursuant to this part.

In addition to the powers otherwise granted by law, the authority has the power and is authorized to make loans to any airport authority or municipal airport that has obtained the guaranty of a creating municipality or participating municipality pursuant to § 4-31-607, for the financing of projects for airport authorities or municipal airports pursuant to a loan agreement. Such loans shall be made from the proceeds of bonds or notes issued by the authority for the purpose of making such loans.

The authority shall establish a repayment schedule to be made by an airport authority or municipal airport under a loan agreement. Such repayments shall be in such amounts as will be at least sufficient, together with other funds available therefor, to pay the principal of, and interest on, bonds and notes issued by the authority for the purpose of providing loans to airport authorities or municipal airports for the financing of projects, and as may be necessary for the authority to maintain a reserve for debt service. The authority may collect an administrative fee in addition to such repayment schedule in an amount as may be set forth in the loan agreement.

The annual repayment schedule for each loan shall be, in cases prior to the funding of such loans or where such loans have been financed on an interim basis other than by bonds, an estimated annual repayment schedule showing debt service requirements under the loan agreement as if the bonds to be issued to fund such loans will bear interest at a rate per annum and mature in such manner as the authority shall establish at the time of the approval of each such loan and, in cases where bonds have been issued to fund such loan, the actual debt service requirements on such bonds.

Acts 1988, ch. 820, § 1.

4-31-605. Administration of loans.

The authority shall administer loans made under this part.

In so doing, the authority may adopt rules and regulations necessary for the effective administration of this part, including the promulgation of prerequisites that must be fulfilled by an airport authority or municipal airport in order to be eligible for a loan, procedures to be followed in making loan applications to the authority, procedures to be followed in the disbursement of loan funds, and procedures for enforcing loan agreements entered into by an airport authority or municipal airport with the authority.

Acts 1988, ch. 820, § 1.

4-31-606. Loan agreements.

Subject to § 4-31-605 and subject to any existing contractual obligations of the airport authority or municipal airport, the authority may enter into a loan agreement with any airport authority or municipal airport, and any airport authority or municipal airport may enter into a loan agreement with the authority, for loans for financing projects, if such repayment under such loan agreement is guaranteed or secured by a creating municipality or participating municipality as set forth in § 4-31-607.

Any loan agreement may include such provisions as may be agreed upon by the authority and the airport authority or municipal airport, subject to § 4-31-605 and shall additionally include, in substance, the following:

The amount of the loan, not to exceed the estimated reasonable cost of the project to be financed, as determined by the authority; and

An agreement by the airport authority or municipal airport to:

Proceed expeditiously with, and complete, the project in accordance with the loan agreement approved pursuant to this part;

Not dispose of the project without the prior approval of the authority during the term of the loan agreement;

Pledge any available sources of revenues, income and charges, including grants and contributions from the federal government or other sources, make payments according to the repayment schedule established by the authority and make such payments; and

Establish and maintain adequate financial records for the project, including maintaining an inventory, cause to be made an annual audit of the financial records and transactions covering each fiscal year in accordance with generally accepted government auditing standards, and furnish a copy of such audits to the comptroller of the treasury.

Failure of an airport authority or municipal airport to file the audit required by subdivision (b)(2)(D) with the comptroller of the treasury each year, until the loan, together with interest, is totally repaid, constitutes a Class A misdemeanor, and anyone violating this provision, upon conviction, shall be liable for a fine of not less than ten dollars ($10.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each violation, and each day of continued violation constitutes a separate offense.

Acts 1988, ch. 820, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, 40-35-111.

4-31-607. Guarantees by municipality of loan agreement.

Any creating municipality or participating municipality under title 42, chapters 3-5 is hereby authorized pursuant to resolution adopted by the governing body of any such creating or participating municipality to guarantee or in any other manner to secure the payment of the airport authority or municipal airport under the loan agreement. Such guarantee shall include the pledge of unobligated state-shared taxes of the creating or participating municipality to the repayment of the loan agreement of the airport authority or municipal airport; provided, that at the time of approval of a loan agreement, the annual repayment schedule applicable to all approved loans to an airport authority or municipal airport so guaranteed by a creating or participating municipality to which unobligated state-shared taxes are pledged, when combined with annual repayment schedules applicable to approved loans to the creating or participating municipality under parts 4 and 5 of this chapter, title 68, chapter 221, parts 2 and 5, and [former] title 68, chapter 211, part 4 [repealed] or other state loan programs, shall not exceed one hundred percent (100%) of the unobligated amount of annual state-shared taxes paid to the creating or participating municipality as shown by the latest completed audit for the state's fiscal year.

In the event the funds pledged by an airport authority or municipal airport shall be insufficient to meet the payments as established by the authority, any creating or participating municipality guaranteeing such loan agreement shall levy a tax on property sufficient to make such payments, which shall be in addition to all other taxes authorized or limited by law.

In the event any airport authority or municipal airport having entered into a loan agreement shall fail to remit funds in accordance with the annual repayment schedule established by the authority, the commissioner of finance and administration shall deliver by certified mail a written notice of such failure to the airport authority or municipal airport and to the creating or participating municipality guaranteeing such loan agreement, within five (5) days of such failure.

In the event the airport authority or municipal airport and the creating or participating municipality guaranteeing such loan agreement shall fail to remit the amount set forth in the notice within sixty (60) days of the receipt of the notice, the commissioner shall, without further authorization, withhold such sum or part of such sum from any state-shared taxes that are otherwise apportioned to such creating or participating municipality for the benefit of the authority issuing bonds or notes for the purposes referred to in this part. The creating or participating municipality shall not have any claim on state-shared taxes withheld as permitted under this part.

The county mayor, the county clerk, or the mayor and the city recorder for any creating or participating municipality, are authorized and directed upon adoption of such resolution to execute all documents necessary to guarantee or in any other manner to secure the payment of the airport authority or municipal airport under the loan agreement.

Prior to any meeting where such authorization will be considered by the governing body of a creating or participating municipality, a notice shall be published at least five (5) days in advance of such meeting in a newspaper of general circulation within the creating or participating municipality describing the matter to be considered and containing an estimate of the dollar amount of any contingent liability proposed to be undertaken by the creating or participating municipality.

The resolution of such creating or participating municipality authorized to be taken under this part may be adopted at the meeting of the governing body of such municipality at which such resolution is introduced and shall take effect immediately upon its adoption.

Acts 1988, ch. 820, § 1; 1989, ch. 233, §§ 5, 6; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1989, ch. 233, § 59 provided that the amendment by that act shall not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, or proceedings that were begun before May 3, 1989. Section 60 provided that the provisions of Acts 1989, ch. 233 are declared to be remedial in nature and all provisions of that act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

Title 68, chapter 211, part 4, referred to in this section and concerning resource and energy recovery, was repealed by Acts 1996, ch. 846, § 48, effective July 1, 1996.

Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

4-31-608. Further agreements and guarantees with authority.

The authority has the right to enter into such further agreements with an airport authority or municipal airport and require such further guarantees or securities as it may see fit prior to, or simultaneously with, the issuance of bonds or notes or to refuse to issue bonds or notes until such agreements or securities, in any form that the authority may elect, are agreed to or are obtained.

Acts 1988, ch. 820, § 1.

4-31-609. Approval of agreements — Audits.

All loan agreements entered into pursuant to this part shall be subject to approval by the attorney general and reporter as to the form and by the commissioner of finance and administration, and all payments made pursuant to such loan agreement shall be as to funding approved by the authority, and such payments shall be subject to audit at any time.

Acts 1988, ch. 820, § 1.

4-31-610. Bonds and notes — Issuance and terms — Security — Defaults.

The bonds and notes for any project shall be authorized by resolution of the authority, may be in one (1) or more series, shall bear such date or dates, and shall mature at such time or times, in the case of any such note or any renewals thereof, not exceeding eight (8) years from the date of issue of such original note, and in the case of any such bond not exceeding thirty (30) years from the date of issue, as such resolution or resolutions may provide.

The bonds and notes shall bear interest at such rate or rates, be in such denominations, be in such form, either coupon or registered, carry such registration privileges, be executed in such manner, be payable in such medium of payment at such place or places, and be subject to such terms of redemption as such resolution or resolutions may provide.

The bonds and notes may be sold at public or private sale, at such price or prices as the authority may provide.

Any resolution or resolutions authorizing any bonds or notes, or any series thereof, may contain the following provisions, which shall be a part of the contract with the holders thereof:

Pledging all or any part of the moneys that the authority is permitted by law to pledge, and securing the payment of the bonds or notes or of any series thereof, subject to such agreements with bondholders or noteholders as may then exist;

Creating and establishing such funds and accounts as may be deemed necessary or advisable and setting aside reserves or sinking funds and agreeing as to the maintenance, regulation and disposition thereof;

Limiting the purpose to which the proceeds of sale of bonds or notes may be applied, and pledging such proceeds to secure the payment of the bonds or notes or of any series thereof;

Limiting the issuance of additional bonds or notes, the terms upon which additional bonds or notes may be issued and secured, and the refunding of outstanding or other bonds or notes;

Prescribing the procedure, if any, by which the terms of any contract with bondholders or noteholders may be amended or abrogated, the amount of bonds or notes the holders of which must consent thereto, and the manner in which such consent may be given;

Investing in a trustee or trustees such property, rights, powers and duties in trust as the authority may determine, which may include any or all of the rights, powers and duties of the trustee appointed by the bondholders pursuant to § 4-31-106 and limiting or abrogating the right of the bondholders or to appoint a trustee or limiting the rights, powers and duties of such trustee; and

Setting forth any other matters, of like or different character, that in any way affect the security or protection of the bonds or notes.

The authority, subject to such agreements with bondholders or noteholders as may then exist, shall have power to purchase notes or bonds out of any moneys available therefor at a price not exceeding:

The redemption price then applicable, plus accrued interest to the next interest payment date thereon, if the notes or bonds are then redeemable; or

The redemption price applicable on the first date after such purchase upon which the bonds or notes become subject to redemption, plus accrued interest to such date if the notes or bonds are not then redeemable.

All bonds and notes so purchased shall be cancelled.

Neither the members of the authority nor any person executing the bonds or notes shall be liable personally on the bonds or notes or be subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance thereof.

In the event any member of the authority whose signature or facsimile signature thereof shall appear on any bonds or coupons shall cease to be a member of the authority before the delivery thereof, such signature or facsimile signature nevertheless shall be valid and sufficient for all purposes, the same as if such member had remained a member of the authority until after such delivery.

Any pledge made by the authority pursuant to this chapter shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made, the moneys, or property so pledged and thereafter received by the authority shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act, and the lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise against the authority, irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof.

Neither the resolution nor any other instrument by which a pledge is created need be recorded.

The bonds and notes shall not be invalid for any irregularity or defect in the proceedings for the issuance or sale thereof.

Such bonds and notes shall contain a recital that they have been authorized and issued pursuant to the laws of the state, including particularly this chapter, which recital shall be conclusive evidence of their validity and the regularity of their issuance.

Bonds and notes of the authority shall not constitute a debt or a pledge of the faith and credit of the state, any local governmental unit, creating or participating municipality, airport authority or municipal airport, and the holders or owners of such bonds and notes shall have no right to have taxes levied by the general assembly or any local governmental unit, creating or participating municipality or any other taxing authority within the state for the payment of the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on, such bonds and notes, but such bonds and notes shall be payable solely from the revenues and moneys pledged for their payment.

All such bonds and notes shall contain on the face thereof a statement to the effect that the bonds or notes, as the case may be, are not a debt of the state, any local governmental unit, creating or participating municipality, any other taxing authority, or any airport authority or municipal airport within the state, but are payable solely from revenues and moneys pledged to the payment thereof.

The authority has the power, and is hereby authorized, to issue from time to time renewal notes, and bonds to pay notes issued in anticipation of such bonds, and, whenever it deems refunding expedient, to refund any bonds by the issuance of refunding bonds, whether the bonds to be refunded have or have not matured, and to issue bonds partly to refund bonds then outstanding and partly for any other authorized purpose.

Such refunding bonds and renewal notes may be issued without further authorization, such issuance being deemed authorized by the law authorizing the bonds and notes to be renewed, paid or refunded.

The refunding bonds shall be sold and the proceeds applied to the purchase, redemption or payment of the bonds to be refunded.

Except as may otherwise be expressly provided by the authority, each issue of its notes or bonds issued pursuant to this section shall be limited special obligations of the authority, payable solely from and secured solely by moneys derived by the authority from all or a portion of payments made by an airport authority or municipal airport pursuant to the loan agreement with such airport authority or municipal airport as permitted under the state loan programs, as provided in the resolution authorizing such bonds and notes.

In the event the authority shall default in the payment of principal of or interest and premium, if any, on the bonds or notes, the determination of such default and the remedies therefor shall be governed by § 4-31-106.

Acts 1988, ch. 820, § 1.

4-31-611. Airport authority fund.

The authority is hereby authorized to establish in the state treasury a separate special trust fund of the authority for each separate issue of bonds or notes that is similarly secured to be known as the “airport authority fund,” and to bear such additional designation as the authority deems appropriate to properly identify each fund.

The state hereby covenants and agrees that from and after the issuance of any bonds or notes under and pursuant to this part, moneys derived by the state from payments made pursuant to loan agreements with such airport authorities or municipal airports as permitted under the terms of the loan agreements that are pledged to the payment of such bonds or notes shall be paid into the particular fund established for the issuance of bonds or notes to which such moneys are pledged.

Such moneys shall be accounted for separately from all other moneys in the state treasury and shall be applied by the authority solely for the purpose of paying principal of and interest and premium, if any, on such issue of bonds and notes issued pursuant to this section, refunding moneys due to participating airport authorities or municipal airports where appropriate, and paying all other costs incidental to the administration of the authority in connection with the loan agreements and the issuance of such issue of bonds and notes.

Acts 1988, ch. 820, § 1.

4-31-612. Enforcement of agreements.

The authority has the right, in addition to all other rights, by mandamus or other suit, action or proceeding in any court of competent jurisdiction, to require the airport authority or municipal airport and the governing body and any proper officer, agent or employee of the airport authority or municipal airport to carry out any agreements and to perform its and their duties under this part or under any rule or regulation of the authority adopted pursuant thereto.

Acts 1988, ch. 820, § 1.

4-31-613. Debt limit not applicable.

Any airport authority or municipal airport may enter into loan agreements under this part, notwithstanding and without regard to any limit on indebtedness provided by law.

Acts 1988, ch. 820, § 1.

4-31-614. Actions of governing body.

All action required or authorized to be taken under this part by the governing body of any airport authority or municipal airport may be by resolution, which resolution may be adopted at the meeting of the governing body at which such resolution is introduced and shall take effect immediately upon its adoption.

Acts 1988, ch. 820, § 1.

4-31-615. Provisions supplemental.

This part shall be in addition and supplemental to any other law providing for financing by airport authorities or municipal airports and shall not be deemed to amend or repeal any other law.

No proceedings by an airport authority or municipal airport shall be required for loan agreements hereunder, except as provided by this part, any law to the contrary notwithstanding.

No other requirements or restrictions applicable to borrowing by any airport authority or municipal airport contained in any other law shall be applicable to loans under this part.

Acts 1988, ch. 820, § 1.